California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) Are not approved by the American Bar Association or the Committee of Bar Examiners.

(b) The Committee of Bar Examiners shall assess and collect a fee from unaccredited law schools in an amount sufficient to fund the regulatory and oversight responsibilities imposed by this section. Nothing in this subdivision precludes the board of trustees from using other funds or
 fees collected by the State Bar or by the examining committee to supplement the funding of the regulatory and oversight responsibilities imposed by this section with other funds, if that supplemental funding is deemed necessary and appropriate to mitigate some of the additional costs of the regulation and oversight to facilitate the provision of a legal education at an affordable cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 6.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6046.8.

(a) At least once every seven years, or more frequently if directed by the Supreme Court, the board of trustees shall oversee an evaluation of the bar examination to determine if it properly tests for minimally needed competence for entry-level attorneys and shall make a determination, supported by findings, whether to adjust the examination or the passing score based on the evaluation.

(b) The board of trustees shall report the results of the evaluation and any determination regarding adjustment in the passing score to the Supreme Court and the Legislature no later than March 15, 2018, and at least every seven years from the date of the previous report.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the report
 due in 2025 shall be deferred for a period of time not to exceed seven years from the deployment of a new bar examination developed in accordance with the order of the California Supreme Court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 7.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6047.

Subject to the approval of the board, the examining committee may adopt such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary or advisable for the purpose of making effective the qualifications prescribed in Article 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6049.

(a) Upon the trial and hearing of all matters, the State Bar Court may do all of the following:

(1) Take and hear evidence pertaining to the proceeding.

(2) Administer oaths and affirmations.

(3) Compel, by subpoena, the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and documents pertaining to the proceeding.

(b) In the conduct of investigations, the chief trial counsel or his or her designee, may compel, by subpoena, the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and documents pertaining to the
 investigation.

(c) In the conduct of all formal proceedings, each party may compel, by subpoena, the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and documents pertaining to the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 38.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6049.1.

(a) In any disciplinary proceeding under this chapter, a certified copy of a final order made by any court of record or any body authorized by law or by rule of court to conduct disciplinary proceedings against attorneys, of the United States or of any state or territory of the United States or of the District of Columbia, determining that a licensee of the State Bar committed professional misconduct in such other jurisdiction shall be conclusive evidence that the licensee is culpable of professional misconduct in this state, subject only to the exceptions set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) The board may provide by rule for procedures for the conduct of an expedited disciplinary proceeding against a licensee of the State Bar
 upon receipt by the State Bar of a certified copy of a final order determining that the licensee has been found culpable of professional misconduct in a proceeding in another jurisdiction conducted as specified in subdivision (a). The issues in the expedited proceeding shall be limited to the following:

(1) The degree of discipline to impose.

(2) Whether, as a matter of law, the licensee’s culpability determined in the proceeding in the other jurisdiction would not warrant the imposition of discipline in the State of California under the laws or rules binding upon licensees of the State Bar at the time the licensee committed misconduct in such other jurisdiction, as determined by the proceedings specified in subdivision (a).

(3) Whether the proceedings of the other jurisdiction lacked fundamental constitutional
 protection.

The licensee of the State Bar subject to the proceeding under this section shall bear the burden of establishing that the issues in paragraphs (2) and (3) do not warrant the imposition of discipline in this state.

(c) In proceedings conducted under subdivision (b), the parties need not be afforded an opportunity for discovery unless the State Bar Court department or panel having jurisdiction so orders upon a showing of good cause.

(d) In any proceedings conducted under this chapter, a duly certified copy of any portion of the record of disciplinary proceedings of another jurisdiction conducted as specified in subdivision (a) may be received in evidence.

(e) This section shall not prohibit the institution of proceedings under Section 6044, 6101, or 6102, as may be
 appropriate, concerning any licensee of the State Bar based upon the licensee’s conduct in another jurisdiction, whether or not licensed as an attorney in the other jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 39.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6049.2.

In all disciplinary proceedings pursuant to this chapter, the testimony of a witness given in a contested civil action or special proceeding to which the person complained against is a party, or in whose behalf the action or proceeding is prosecuted or defended, may be received in evidence, so far as relevant and material to the issues in the disciplinary proceedings, by means of a duly authenticated transcript of such testimony and without proof of the nonavailability of the witness; provided, the State Bar Court may order the production of and testimony by such witness, in lieu of or in addition to receiving a transcript of his or her testimony and may decline to receive in evidence any such transcript of testimony, in whole or in part, when it appears that the testimony was given under circumstances that
 did not require or allow an opportunity for full cross examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 40.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6050.

Whenever any person subpoenaed to appear and give testimony or to produce books, papers or documents refuses to appear or testify before the subpoenaing body, or to answer any pertinent or proper questions, or to produce such books, papers or documents, he or she is in contempt of the subpoenaing body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 453, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.

The State Bar Court or the chief trial counsel may report the fact that a person under subpoena is in contempt of the subpoenaing body to the superior court in and for the county in which the proceeding, investigation or other matter is being conducted and thereupon the court may issue an attachment in the form usual in the superior court, directed to the sheriff of the county, commanding the sheriff to attach the person and immediately bring him or her before the court.

On the return of the attachment, and the production of the person attached, the superior court has jurisdiction of the matter, and the person charged may purge himself or herself of the contempt in the same way, and the same proceedings shall be had, and the same penalties may be imposed, and the same
 punishment inflicted, as in the case of a witness subpoenaed to appear and give evidence on the trial of a civil cause before a superior court.

In lieu of the procedure specified above, the court may enter an order directing the person alleged to be in contempt to appear before the court at a specified time and place and then and there show cause why he or she has not attended or testified or produced the writings as required. A copy of the order shall be served upon that person. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued and no good cause is shown for the refusal to appear or testify or produce the writings, the court shall enter an order that the person appear, testify, or produce writings, as the case may be. Upon failure to obey the order, the person shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

A proceeding pursuant to this section shall be entitled “In the Matter of (state name), Alleged
 Contemnor re State Bar (proceeding, investigation or matter) No. (insert number).”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 41.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6051.1.

A motion to quash a subpoena issued pursuant to Section 6049 shall be brought in the State Bar Court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 453, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

6052.

The State Bar Court or the chief trial counsel, or their designee, may administer oaths and issue any subpoena pursuant to Section 6049.

Depositions may be taken and used as provided in the rules of procedure adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 698, Sec. 7.   (SB 176)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6053.

Whenever in an investigation or proceeding provided for or authorized by this chapter, the mental or physical condition of the licensee of the State Bar is a material issue, the board or the committee having jurisdiction may order the licensee to be examined by one or more physicians or psychiatrists designated by it. The reports of such persons shall be made available to the licensee and the State Bar and may be received in evidence in such investigation or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 42.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6054.

(a) State and local law enforcement and licensing bodies and departments, officers and employees thereof, and officials and attachés of the courts of this state shall cooperate with and give reasonable assistance and information, including the providing of state summary criminal history information and local summary criminal history information, to the State Bar of California or any authorized representative thereof, in connection with any investigation or proceeding within the jurisdiction of the State Bar of California, regarding the admission to the practice of law or discipline of attorneys or their reinstatement to the practice of law.

(b) The State Bar of California shall require that an applicant for admission or reinstatement to the practice of law in
 California, or may require a licensee, to submit or resubmit fingerprints to the Department of Justice and to the Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to establish the identity of the applicant and in order to determine whether the applicant or licensee has a record of criminal conviction in this state or in other states, including through a national criminal history check.

(c) (1) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the State Bar shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all persons applying for admission to the State Bar of California for all applicants for reinstatement, and for all active and inactive licensees of the State Bar who are seeking to change their license status from inactive to active or whose fingerprints have not otherwise been submitted to the Department of Justice for the purposes
 described in this section. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “applicant for reinstatement” means individuals initiating reinstatement proceedings with the State Bar after resignation with or without charges pending and after disbarment.

(d) The State Bar may use the information obtained from the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation as a result of the fingerprinting of an applicant or licensee, and the State Bar’s use of that information shall be limited to the official use of the State Bar in establishing the identity of the applicant and in determining the character and fitness of the applicant for admission or reinstatement, and in discovering prior and subsequent criminal arrests of an applicant, licensee, or applicant
 for reinstatement. The State Bar shall notify the Department of Justice about individuals who are no longer licensees and applicants who are denied admission to the State Bar within 30 days of any change in status of a licensee or denial of admission. All fingerprint records of applicants admitted or licensees reinstated, or provided by a licensee, shall be retained thereafter by the Department of Justice for the limited purpose of criminal arrest notification to the State Bar.

(e) If required to be fingerprinted pursuant to this section, a licensee of the State Bar who fails to be fingerprinted may be enrolled as an inactive licensee pursuant to rules adopted by the board of trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 8.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. California Lawyers Association [6055. - 6056.3.]

6055.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Nonprofit Association Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 24.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6056.

(a) The State Bar, acting pursuant to Section 6001, shall assist the Sections of the State Bar to incorporate as a private, nonprofit corporation organized under Section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code and shall transfer the functions and activities of the 16 State Bar Sections and the California Young Lawyers Association to the new private, nonprofit corporation, to be called the California Lawyers Association. The California Lawyers Association shall be a voluntary association, shall not be a part of the State Bar, and shall not be funded in any way through mandatory fees collected by the State Bar. The California Lawyers Association shall have independent contracting authority and full control of its resources. The California Lawyers
 Association shall not be considered a state, local, or other public body for any
 purpose, including, but not limited to, the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) The California Lawyers Association shall establish the criteria for membership in the California Young Lawyers Association. The California Lawyers Association may change the name of the California Young Lawyers Association to another name consistent with the criteria for membership and its mission.

(c) The State Bar may assist the California Lawyers Association in gaining appointment to the American Bar Association (ABA) House of Delegates, consistent
 with the California Lawyers Association’s mission and subject to the consent of the ABA.

(d) The State Bar shall support the California Lawyers Association’s efforts to partner with the Continuing Education of the Bar (CEB), subject to agreement by the University of California.

(e) The State Bar of California shall ensure that State Bar staff who support the Sections, as of September 15, 2017, are reassigned to other comparable positions within the State Bar.

(f) The Sections of the State Bar or the California Lawyers Association and the State Bar shall enter into a memorandum of understanding regarding the terms of separation of the Sections of the State Bar from the State Bar and mandatory duties of the California
 Lawyers Association, including a requirement to provide all of the following:

(1) Low- and no-cost mandatory continuing legal education (MCLE).

(2) Expertise and information to the State Bar, as requested.

(3) Educational programs and materials to the licensees of the State Bar and the public.

(g) The State Bar of California shall assist the California Lawyers Association in meeting the association’s requirement to provide low- and no-cost MCLE by the inclusion on the State Bar’s internet website of easily accessible links to the low- and no-cost MCLE provided by the California Lawyers Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 9.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6056.3.

(a) On or before January 31, 2018, the State Bar shall transfer to the Association all membership fees and other funds paid for membership in the sections or paid in sponsorships, donations, or funds for the benefit of the sections, including, but not limited to, State Bar section financial reserves, with an accounting that specifies which funds are attributable to each individual section of the Association. The State Bar shall work with the Association to transfer all contracts previously entered into by the State Bar on behalf of
 the sections, as soon as practicable, consistent with any contractual obligations and legal requirements, unless an alternative arrangement is mutually acceptable to the State Bar and the Association.

(b) On or before January 31, 2018, the State Bar shall provide an itemized list of any outstanding expenses, including contracts made on behalf of section activities.

(c) The State Bar and the Association shall confer and work cooperatively to establish an orderly transition plan.

(d) All current intellectual property of the
 Sections of the State Bar and the board of governors, currently in the possession of the State Bar, shall be transferred to and retained by the 
 Association, including, but not limited to, publications, educational materials, online education, membership lists of section members, and products.

(e) Programs created by the sections within the State Bar’s 
 online education catalog shall be transferred to the Association.

(f) The amount of the State Bar sections’ reserves that are to be transferred shall be determined by cooperative review and accounting between the State Bar and the Association no later than January 31, 2018. If the State Bar and Sections of the State Bar do not agree on the amount by
 January 31, 2018, the parties shall submit the matter to binding arbitration by a neutral arbitrator who will determine the amount. If the parties cannot agree on a neutral arbitrator, each shall select a neutral arbitrator and the two neutral arbitrators shall select a single neutral arbitrator to determine the amount. The neutral arbitrator chosen to oversee the matter may hire an auditor to assist in this task. The fees charged by the arbitrator, including any auditor fees, shall be borne equally by the State Bar and the Association.

(g) The State Bar shall no longer include individual sections or voluntary organizations that are similar to
 Sections
 of the State Bar as they existed before being transferred to the Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 24.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Admission to the Practice of Law [6060. - 6069.]

6060.

To be certified to the Supreme Court for admission and a license to practice law, a person who has not been admitted to practice law in a sister state, United States jurisdiction, possession, territory, or dependency or in a foreign country shall:

(a) Be at least 18 years of age.

(b) (1) Be of good moral character.

(2) (A) In reviewing whether an applicant is of good moral character under this subdivision, the staff of the State Bar or the members of the examining committee shall not review or consider the person’s medical records relating to mental
 health, except

if the applicant seeks to use the record for either of the following purposes:

(i) To demonstrate that the applicant is of good moral character.

(ii) As a mitigating factor to explain a specific act of misconduct.

(B) The staff of the State Bar and members of the examining committee shall not request or seek to review any medical records relating to mental health, including by obtaining the consent of the applicant to disclose such records, except as requested by an applicant and for a purpose specified in subparagraph (A).

(c) Before beginning the study of law, have done either of the following:

(1) Completed at least two years of college work, which college work shall be at least one-half of the collegiate work acceptable for a bachelor’s degree granted on the basis of a four-year period of study by a college or university approved by the examining committee.

(2) Have attained in apparent intellectual ability the equivalent of at least two years of college work by taking examinations in subject matters and achieving the scores as are prescribed by the
 examining committee.

(d) Have registered with the State Bar as a law student within 90 days after beginning the study of law. The State Bar, upon a showing of good cause, may permit a later registration.

(e) Have done either of the following:

(1) Had conferred upon them a juris doctor (J.D.) degree or a bachelor of laws (LL.B.) degree by a law school accredited by the examining committee or approved by the American Bar Association.

(2) Studied law diligently and in good faith for at least four years in any of the following manners:

(A) (i) In
 a law school that is authorized or approved to confer professional degrees and requires classroom attendance of its students for a minimum of 270 hours a year.

(ii) A person who has received their legal education in a foreign state or country where the common law of England does not constitute the basis of jurisprudence shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the State Bar that the person’s education, experience, and qualifications qualify them to take the examination.

(B) In a law office in this state and under the personal supervision of a licensee of the State Bar of California who is, and for at least the last five years continuously has been, engaged in the active practice of law. It is the duty of the supervising attorney to render any periodic reports to the State Bar as
 required.

(C) In the chambers and under the personal supervision of a judge of a court of record of this state. It is the duty of the supervising judge to render any periodic reports to the State Bar as required.

(D) By instruction in law from a correspondence law school authorized or approved to confer professional degrees by this state, which requires 864 hours of preparation and study per year for four years.

(E) By any combination of the methods referred to in this paragraph.

(f) Have passed any examination in professional responsibility or legal ethics as the
 examining committee may prescribe.

(g) Have passed the general bar examination given by the examining committee.

(h) (1) Have passed a law students’ examination administered by the examining committee after completion of their first year of law study. Those who pass the examination within its first three administrations upon becoming eligible to take the examination, shall
 receive credit for all law studies completed to the time the examination is passed. Those who do not pass the examination within the number of administrations allowed by this subdivision, upon becoming eligible to take the examination, but who subsequently pass the examination, shall receive credit for one year of legal study only.

(2) (A) This requirement does not apply to a student who has satisfactorily completed their first year of law study at a law school
 accredited by the examining committee and who has completed at least two years of college work prior to matriculating in the accredited law school, nor shall this requirement apply to an applicant who has passed the bar examination of a sister state or of a country in which the common law of England constitutes the basis of jurisprudence.

(B) The law students’ examination shall be administered twice a year at reasonable intervals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 13.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.1.

(a) Any disciplinary action taken against an individual at a university or an accredited law school for violation of university or law school rules of conduct shall not be used as the sole basis for denying the individual admission to practice law in the State of California.

(b) This section shall not apply to university or law school violations which involve moral turpitude or that result in criminal prosecution under the laws of the State of California or any other state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1639, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.10.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the State Bar shall transmit to the Legislature a report detailing the number of complaints regarding access issues related to the biannual state bar exam detailed as follows:

(1) The testing location in which the complaints occurred.

(2) The nature of the access related complaints.

(3) Accommodations provided to persons levying access related complaints.

(4) Any additional information the State Bar determines to be relevant and necessary for the assessment of the existing programs for addressing
 access issues related to the biannual state bar exam.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 11.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.2.

(a) All investigations or proceedings conducted by the State Bar concerning the moral character of an applicant shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) unless the applicant, in writing, waives the confidentiality.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the records of the proceeding may be disclosed in response to either of the following:

(1) A lawfully issued subpoena.

(2) A written
 request from a government agency responsible for either the enforcement of civil or criminal laws or the professional licensing of individuals that is conducting an investigation about the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 15.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any identifying information submitted by an applicant to the State Bar for admission and a license to practice law and all State Bar admission records, including, but not limited to, bar examination scores, law school grade point average (GPA), undergraduate GPA, Law School Admission Test scores, race or ethnicity, and any information contained within the State Bar Admissions database or any file or other data created by the State Bar with information submitted by the applicant that may identify an individual applicant, other than information described in subdivision (b), shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but not limited to, the California Public Records Act
 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Subject to existing state and federal laws protecting education records, subdivision (a) does not prohibit the disclosure of any of the following:

(1) The names of applicants who have passed any examination administered, given, or prescribed by the Committee of Bar Examiners.

(2) Information that is provided at the request of an applicant to another jurisdiction where the applicant is seeking admission to the practice of law.

(3) Information provided to a law school that is necessary for the purpose of the law school’s compliance with accreditation or regulatory
 requirements. Beginning with the release of results from the July 2018 bar examination, the information provided to a law school shall also include the bar examination results of the law school’s graduates allocated to the law school and the scores of any graduate allocated to the law school who did not pass the bar examination and who consents to the release of the graduate’s scores to the law school. Consent of a law school graduate to the release of the graduate’s scores may be obtained by a check-off on the graduate’s application to take the bar examination. For purposes of this paragraph, “scores” means the same scores reported to a graduate who did not successfully pass the bar examination.

(4) Information provided to the National Conference of Bar Examiners or a successor nonprofit organization in connection to the State Bar’s
 administration of any examination.

(5) This subdivision shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2016.

(c) Disclosure of any of the information in paragraphs (2) to
 (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) shall not constitute a waiver under Section 7921.505 of the Government Code of the exemption from disclosure provided for in subdivision (a) of this section.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law except existing state and federal laws protecting education records, any information received from an educational or testing entity that is collected by the State Bar for the purpose of conducting a Law School Bar Exam Performance Study as the State Bar has been directed to do by the California Supreme Court by letter dated February 28, 2017, other than aggregate, summary, or statistical data that does not identify any person and does not provide substantial risk of identification of any person, shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to any state law, including, but
 not limited to, the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) Nothing in this subdivision is intended to impact any litigation pending on the effective date of the measure that added this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 16.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.3.

(a) An application to take the California bar examination administered in February must be filed with the State Bar not later than the first business day of the preceding November, and an application to take the California bar examination administered in July must be filed with the State Bar not later than the first business day of the preceding April. However, an applicant who was unsuccessful on the examination last administered shall be allowed 10 business days from the date of the general announcement of results of that examination in which to timely file an application to take the next scheduled examination.

(b) The State Bar may accept applications to take the California bar
 examination filed after the timely deadlines specified in subdivision (a) from applicants if the application is accompanied by the timely application fee and the late filing fee fixed by the board as follows:

(1) An application to take the California bar examination filed between the first and last business days in November for the February examination or between the first and last business days of April for the July examination shall be accepted if it is accompanied by the timely filing fee and a late fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(2) An application to take the California bar examination filed between the last business day of November and January 1 for the February examination or between the last business day of April and June 1 for the July examination shall be
 accepted if it is accompanied by the timely filing fee and a late fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(3) An application to take the California bar examination filed after January 1 for the February examination and after June 1 for the July examination shall not be accepted.

(c) Application fees for the California bar examination, including fees for late filing, shall be refunded if the applicant does not take the California bar examination because of the death of an immediate family member or the serious illness or disabling injury of the applicant or a member of their immediate family. A deduction may be made from the refund for administrative costs. The board shall adopt regulations for the administration of this subdivision. This subdivision shall not be
 construed to prohibit the refund of fees in instances other than those specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.5.

Neither the board, nor any committee authorized by it, shall require that applicants for admission to practice law in California pass different final bar examinations depending upon the manner or school in which they acquire their legal education.

This section shall not prohibit the board, or any committee authorized by it, from establishing a different bar examination for applicants who are admitted to practice before the highest court of another state or of any jurisdiction where the common law of England constitutes the basis of jurisprudence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1666.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.6.

Notwithstanding Section 30 of this code and Section 17520 of the Family Code, the Committee of Bar Examiners may accept for registration, and the State Bar may process for an original or renewed license to practice law, an application from an individual containing a federal tax identification number, or other appropriate identification number as determined by the State Bar, in lieu of a social security number, if the individual is not eligible for a social security account number at the time of application and is not in noncompliance with a judgment or order for support pursuant to Section 17520 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.7.

The examining committee shall be responsible for the approval, regulation, and oversight of degree-granting law schools that meet both of the following:

(a) Award the juris doctor (J.D.) professional degree in California.

(b) Are not approved by the American Bar Association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 10.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6060.9.

Approval of any agency or agencies not existing under and by virtue of the laws of this State shall not be made a condition for accreditation of any California law school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 647.)
-------------------------------------------

6061.

Any law school that is not accredited by the examining committee of the State Bar shall provide every student with a disclosure statement, subsequent to the payment of any application fee but prior to the payment of any registration fee, containing all of the following information:

(a) The school is not accredited. However, in addition, if the school has been approved by other agencies, that fact may be so stated.

(b) Where the school has not been in operation for 10 years, the assets and liabilities of the school. However, if the school has had prior affiliation with another school that has been in operation more than 10 years, has been under the control of another school that has
 been in operation more than 10 years, or has been a successor to a school in operation more than 10 years, this subdivision is not applicable.

(c) The number and percentage of students who have taken and who have passed the first-year law student’s examination and the final bar examination in the previous five years, or since the establishment of the school, whichever time is less, which shall include only those students who have been certified by the school to take the examinations.

(d) The number of legal volumes in the library. This subdivision does not apply to correspondence schools.

(e) The educational background, qualifications, and experience of the faculty, and whether or not the faculty members and administrators (e.g., the dean) are licensees of the California State Bar.

(f) The ratio of faculty to students for the previous five years or since the establishment of the school, whichever time is less.

(g) Whether or not the school has applied for accreditation, and, if so, the date of application and whether or not that application has been withdrawn, is currently pending, or has been finally denied. The school need only disclose information relating to applications made in the previous five years.

(h) That the education provided by the school may not satisfy the requirements of other states for the practice of law. Applicants should inquire regarding those requirements, if any, to the state in which they may wish to practice.

The disclosure statement required by this section shall be signed by each student, who shall receive as a receipt a copy
 of his or her signed disclosure statement. If any school does not comply with these requirements, it shall make a full refund of all fees paid by students.

Subject to approval by the board, the examining committee may adopt reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary for the purpose of ensuring compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 48.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6061.5.

A law school that is not accredited by the examining committee of the State Bar may refer to itself as a university or part of a university and, if it so refers to itself, shall state whether or not the law school is associated with an undergraduate school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 534, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6061.7.

(a) Any law school that is not approved by the American Bar Association shall publicly disclose on its Internet Web site, with a link from the Internet home page under “Admissions,” all of the following information:

(1) Admissions data.

(2) Tuition, fees, and financial aid.

(3) Conditional scholarships.

(4) Enrollment data.

(5) Number of full-time and part-time faculty, technically trained librarians, and
 administrators.

(6) Average class size of each required course and the number of clinical offerings.

(7) Employment outcomes for graduates.

(8) Bar passage data.

(b) (1) The information in subdivision (a) shall be disclosed in a standardized information report that is readily accessible to current and prospective students in a manner that is complete, accurate, and not misleading to a reasonable student or applicant.

(2) The State Bar may create a standardized information report template.
